Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3609
Act, applicability.

Each postsecondary institution shall determine a date on or before July 1, 2023, upon which the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act shall begin to apply to such postsecondary institution and the student-athletes who participate in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary institution and to any collegiate athletic association or professional representation in interactions with such postsecondary institution or student-athletes.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 9;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 9.